Hawaii statutes.
§149A-21 Enforcement. (a) If it
appears that a pesticide or device fails to comply with this chapter, the
department may refer the facts with a copy of the results of the analysis or
the examination of the pesticide product or device to the appropriate
governmental agency for prosecution. A warning notice shall be issued before
prosecution proceedings are initiated.

(b) The governmental agency to which any
violation is reported may cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted in the
appropriate court without delay if so warranted.

(c) The department shall, by publication in
such manner as it may prescribe, give notice of all judgments entered in
actions instituted under this chapter. [L 1972, c 58, pt of §1; am L 1975, c
126, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next